Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2268YH (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. 108 Section 1. Section 236.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. A peace officer may file a petition 3 under subsection 1 on behalf of a person if that person claims 4 to be in present danger of domestic abuse and the person 5 requests the peace officer to submit the petition. 6